Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-190
County ordinance; reading by title;
suspension of requirement; adoption; vote required; revision or amendment.

(1) A county
ordinance shall be read by title on three different days unless three-fourths
of the county board members, following the public hearing on the ordinance,
vote to suspend this requirement. If such requirement is suspended, the ordinance
shall be read by title or number and then moved for final adoption. Three-fourths
of the county board members may require a reading of any such ordinance in
full before adoption under either procedure set out in this section. The votes
of each member shall be called aloud and recorded. To adopt any ordinance,
the concurrence of a majority of the whole number of the members of the county
board shall be required.

(2) A county
ordinance shall contain no subject which is not clearly expressed in the title,
and no ordinance or section thereof shall be revised or amended unless the
new ordinance contains the entire ordinance or section as revised or amended
and the ordinance or section that is amended is repealed.

Laws 2009, LB532, § 4.